Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4517
Relief from liability and indemnification.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a second-trust instrument may not relieve an authorized fiduciary from liability for breach of trust to a greater extent than the first-trust instrument.

(b) A second-trust instrument may provide for indemnification of an authorized fiduciary of the first trust or another person acting in a fiduciary capacity under the first trust for any liability or claim that would have been payable from the first trust if the decanting power had not been exercised.

(c) A second-trust instrument may not reduce fiduciary liability in the aggregate.

(d) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a second-trust instrument may divide and reallocate fiduciary powers among fiduciaries, including one or more trustees, distribution advisors, investment advisors, trust protectors, or other persons, and relieve a fiduciary from liability for an act or failure to act of another fiduciary as permitted by law of this state other than the Uniform Trust Decanting Act.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 27.